Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska1-137.01
Actions in another state; disciplinary
action; grounds; board; investigatory duty.

A holder of a certificate as a certified public accountant
or a permit issued under subdivision (1)(a) of section 1-136 who offers or
renders services or uses his or her C.P.A. title or designation in another
state shall be subject to disciplinary action in this state for such an act
committed in either state for which the certificate holder or permitholder
would be subject to discipline for such an act committed in this state. The
board shall investigate any complaint made by the board of accountancy or
equivalent regulatory authority of another state.

Laws 2009, LB31, § 23.